en: Shortbread dough with pure butter
fr: Pâte sablée pur beurre

en: Raw shortbread dough with pure butter
fr: Pâte sablée pur beurre crue

en: Cooked shortbread dough with pure butter
fr: Pâte sablée pur beurre cuite

en: Frozen raw shortbread dough with pure butter
fr: Pâte sablée pur beurre surgelée crue

en: Frozen shortbread dough with pure butter
fr: Pâte sablée pur beurre surgelée

en: Pizza dough, Pizzas dough, Pizza base
bg: Тесто за пица
de: Pizzateige
es: Masa De Pizza, Masa De Pizzas
fi: pizzataikina
fr: Pâtes à pizza, Pâtes à pizzas, Pâte à pizzas, Pâte à pizza
hr: Tijesto za pizzu
hu: Pizza tészta
it: Impasto per pizza
ja: ピザ生地
nl: Pizzadeeg
pl: Ciasto na pizzę, Spody do pizzy

en: Cooked pizza base
fi: Esipaistettu pizzapohja
fr: Pâte à pizza cuite
hr: Kuhana baza za pizzu

en: Pizza pastry base
fr: Préparation pour pâte à pizza

en: Raw thin-crust pizza shell, Raw thin-crust pizza dough
fr: Pâte à pizza fine crue

en: Raw pizza base
fr: Pâte à pizza crue

en: thin-crust pizza shell, thin-crust pizza dough
fr: Pâte à pizza fine

en: Frozen pizza dough
fr: Pâtes à pizza surgelées, pâte à pizza surgelée

en: Foccacia dough
fr: Pâte à focaccia

en: Flammekueche dough
fr: Pâte à flammekueche

en: Sprouts, Germinated seeds
de: Keime, Sprossen
es: Germinados, Semillas germinadas, Brotes
fi: idut
fr: Pousses, Graines germées
hr: Klice
it: Germogli
ja: スプラウト
nl: Kiemen
pl: Kiełki

en: Raw sprouted wheat
fr: Blé germé cru

en: Alfalfa sprouts
es: Germinados de alfalfa
fr: Pousses d'alfalfa
hr: Klice lucerne
ja: 糸もやし, アルファルファもやし
pl: Kiełki lucerny
zh: 苜蓿芽

en: Fresh sprouts, Fresh germinated seeds
de: Rohsprossen
es: Germinados frescos, Semillas germinadas frescas, Brotes frescos
fr: Pousses fraîches, Graines germées fraîches
hr: Svježe klice
nl: Verse kiemen
pl: Świeże kiełki

en: Dried sprouts
fr: Pousses séchées
hr: Osušene klice
nl: Kiemen (gedroogd), Gedroogde kiemen

en: Bamboo shoots, Bamboo sprouts
bg: Бамбукови кълнове
de: Bambuskeime
es: Brotes de bambú
fi: bambunversot
fr: Pousses de bambou, Pousse de bambou
hr: Izdanci bambusa
ja: タケノコ, たけのこ, 筍
nl: Bamboekiemen
pl: Pędy bambusa